Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska22-125
Deuel.

The county of Deuel is bounded as follows: Commencing at the point where the line between ranges forty-one and forty-two, west of the sixth principal meridian intersects the south boundary of Nebraska, eighty-two links west of the monument at the northeast corner of Colorado; thence west along the south boundary line of the State of Nebraska to its intersection with the line between ranges forty-six and forty-seven west; thence north along said range line to the third standard parallel to the north boundary of township twelve, north, on the third standard parallel; thence east along said parallel to the southeast corner of section thirty-two, township thirteen, north, of range forty-six west; thence north on section lines to the northwest corner of section four, township fourteen, north, of range forty-six west; thence east on township lines to the northeast corner of section six, township fourteen, north, range forty-one west; thence south on section lines to the third standard parallel; thence east along said parallel to the northeast boundary of township twelve, range forty-two; thence south on the line between ranges forty-one and forty-two to the place of beginning.

Formed from Cheyenne County under Laws 1879, § 10, p. 355, by vote of electors Nov. 6, 1888;

Laws 1895, c. 24, § 1, p. 125;

R.S.1913, § 838;

Laws 1921, c. 231, § 3, p. 823;

C.S.1922, § 740;

C.S.1929, § 25-127;

R.S.1943, § 22-125.